California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Any record filed with the Department of Justice shall indicate the disposition in those cases diverted pursuant to this chapter. Upon successful completion of a diversion program, the arrest upon which the diversion was based shall be deemed to have never occurred and the court may issue an order to seal the records pertaining to the arrest as described in Section 851.92. The divertee may indicate in response to any question concerning his or her prior criminal record that he or she was not arrested or diverted for the offense, except as specified in subdivision (b). A record pertaining to an arrest resulting in successful completion of a diversion program shall not, without the divertee’s consent, be used in any way that could result in the denial of any employment, benefit, license,
 or certificate.

(b) The divertee shall be advised that, regardless of his or her successful completion of diversion, the arrest upon which the diversion was based may be disclosed by the Department of Justice in response to any peace officer application request and that, notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not relieve him or her of the obligation to disclose the arrest in response to any direct question contained in any questionnaire or application for a position as a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.

(c) The divertee shall be advised that, regardless of the defendant’s successful completion of a deferred entry of judgment program, an order to seal records pertaining to an arrest made pursuant to this section has no effect on a criminal justice agency’s ability to access and use those sealed records and information regarding sealed arrests, as described in
 Section 851.92.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 680, Sec. 6.   (SB 393)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.8. Diversion of Defendants With Cognitive Developmental Disabilities [1001.20. - 1001.34.]

1001.20.

(a) “Developmental disability” means a disability as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4512 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and for which a regional center finds eligibility for services under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act.

(b) “Diversion-related treatment and habilitation” means, but is not limited to, specialized services or special adaptations of generic services, directed toward the alleviation of developmental disability or toward social, personal, physical, or economic habilitation or rehabilitation of an individual with a developmental disability, and includes, but is not limited to, diagnosis, evaluation, treatment, personal care, day care, domiciliary care, special living arrangements, physical,
 occupational, and speech therapy, training, education, sheltered employment, mental health services, recreation, counseling of the individual with this disability and of the individual’s family, protective and other social and sociolegal services, information and referral services, follow-along services, and transportation services necessary to ensure delivery of services to persons with developmental disabilities.

(c) “Regional center” means a regional center for the developmentally disabled established under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act that is organized as a private nonprofit community agency to plan, purchase, and coordinate the delivery of services that cannot be provided by state agencies to developmentally disabled persons residing in a particular geographic catchment area, and that is licensed and funded by the State Department of Developmental Services.

(d) “Director of a regional center” means the executive director of a regional center for the developmentally disabled individual or their designee.

(e) “Agency” means the prosecutor, the probation department, and the regional center involved in a particular defendant’s case.

(f) “Dual agency diversion” means a treatment and habilitation program developed with court approval by the regional center, administered jointly by the regional center and by the probation department, that is individually tailored to the needs of the defendant as derived from the defendant’s individual program plan pursuant to Section 4646 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and that includes, but is not limited to, treatment specifically addressed to the criminal offense charged, for a specified period of time as prescribed in Section 1001.28.

(g) “Single agency diversion” means a treatment and habilitation program developed with court approval by the regional center, administered solely by the regional center without involvement by the probation department, that is individually tailored to the needs of the defendant as derived from the defendant’s individual program plan pursuant to Section 4646 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and that includes, but is not limited to, treatment specifically addressed to the criminal offense charged, for a specified period of time as prescribed in Section 1001.28.

(h) This section is operative January 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 15.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative January 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.21.

(a) This chapter shall apply whenever a case is before any court upon an accusatory pleading at any stage of the criminal proceedings, for any person who has been evaluated by a regional center and who is determined to be a person with a developmental disability by the regional center, and who therefore is eligible for its services.

(b) This chapter applies to any offense that is charged as a misdemeanor or felony offense, except that a defendant may not be placed into a diversion program, pursuant to this section, for any of the following current charged offenses:

(1) Murder or voluntary manslaughter.

(2) An offense
 for which a person, if convicted, would be required to register pursuant to Section 290, except for a violation of Section 314.

(3) Rape.

(4) Lewd or lascivious act on a child under 14 years of age.

(5) Assault with intent to commit rape, sodomy, or oral copulation, in violation of Section 220.

(6) Commission of rape or sexual penetration in concert with another person, in violation of Section 264.1.

(7) Continuous sexual abuse of a child, in violation of Section 288.5.

(8) A violation of subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 11418.

(c) Diversion shall not be
 ordered when the defendant previously has been diverted under this chapter within two years prior to the present criminal proceedings.

(d) This section is operative January 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 16) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 17.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative January 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.22.

The court shall consult with the prosecutor, the defense counsel, the probation department, and the appropriate regional center in order to determine whether a defendant may be diverted pursuant to this chapter. If the defendant is not represented by counsel, the court shall appoint counsel to represent the defendant. When the court suspects that a defendant may have a developmental disability, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1001.20, and the defendant consents to the diversion process and to the case being evaluated for eligibility for regional center services, and waives their right to a speedy trial, the court shall order the prosecutor, the probation department, and the regional center to prepare reports on specified aspects of the defendant’s case. Each report shall be prepared concurrently.

(a) The regional center shall submit a report to the probation department within 25 judicial days of the court’s order. The regional center’s report shall include a determination as to whether the defendant has a developmental disability and is eligible for regional center diversion-related treatment and habilitation services, and the regional center shall also submit to the court a proposed diversion program, individually tailored to the needs of the defendant as derived from the defendant’s individual program plan pursuant to Section 4646 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, which shall include, but not be limited to, treatment addressed to the criminal offense charged for a period of time as prescribed in Section 1001.28. The regional center’s report shall also contain a statement whether the proposed program is available for the defendant through the treatment and habilitation services of the regional centers pursuant to Section 4648 of the
 Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The prosecutor shall submit a report on specified aspects of the defendant’s case, within 30 judicial days of the court’s order, to the court, to each of the other agencies involved in the case, and to the defendant. The prosecutor’s report shall include all of the following:

(1) A statement of whether the defendant’s record indicates the defendant’s diversion pursuant to this chapter within two years prior to the alleged commission of the charged divertible offense.

(2) If the prosecutor recommends that this chapter may be applicable to the defendant, the prosecutor shall recommend either a dual or single agency diversion program and shall advise the court, the probation department, the regional center, and the defendant, in writing, of that determination within 20 judicial days of
 the court’s order to prepare the report.

(3) If the prosecutor recommends against diversion, the prosecutor’s report shall include a declaration in writing to state for the record the grounds upon which the recommendation was made, and the court shall determine, pursuant to Section 1001.23, whether the defendant shall be diverted.

(4) If dual agency diversion is recommended by the prosecutor, a copy of the prosecutor’s report shall also be provided by the prosecutor to the probation department, the regional center, and the defendant within the above prescribed time period. This notification shall include all of the following:

(A) A full description of the proceedings for diversion and the prosecutor’s investigation procedures.

(B) A general explanation
 of the role and authority of the probation department, the prosecutor, the regional center, and the court in the diversion program process.

(C) A clear statement that the court may decide in a hearing not to divert the defendant and that the defendant may have to stand trial for the alleged offense.

(D) A clear statement that should the defendant fail in meeting the terms of the diversion, or if, during the period of diversion, the defendant is subsequently charged with a felony, the defendant may be required, after a hearing, to stand trial for the original diverted offense.

(c) The probation department shall submit a report on specified aspects of the defendant’s case within 30 judicial days of the court’s order, to the court, to each of the other agencies involved in the case, and to the defendant. The probation
 department’s report to the court shall be based upon an investigation by the probation department and consideration of the defendant’s age, developmental disability, employment record, educational background, ties to community agencies and family, treatment history, criminal record if any, and demonstrable motivation and other mitigating factors in determining whether the defendant is a person who would benefit from a diversion-related treatment and habilitation program. The regional center’s report in full shall be appended to the probation department’s report to the court.

(d) This section is operative January 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 18) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 19.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative January 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.23.

(a) Upon the court’s receipt of the reports from the prosecutor, the probation department, and the regional center, and a determination by the regional center that the defendant does not have a developmental disability, the criminal proceedings for the offense charged shall proceed. If the defendant is found to have a developmental disability and to be eligible for regional center services, and the court determines from the various reports submitted to it that the proposed diversion program is acceptable to the court, the prosecutor, the probation department, and the regional center, and if the defendant consents to diversion and waives their right to a speedy trial, the court may order, without a hearing, that the diversion program be implemented for a period of time as prescribed in Section 1001.28.

(b) After consideration of the probation department’s report, the report of the regional center, the report of the prosecutor relating to the prosecutor’s recommendation for or against diversion, the defendant’s violence and criminal history, the relationship of the developmental disability to the charged offense, and the current charged offense, and any other relevant information, and the court is satisfied that the defendant will not pose an unreasonable risk of danger to public safety, as defined in Section 1170.18, if treated in the community, the court shall determine if the defendant shall be diverted under either dual or single agency supervision, and referred for habilitation or rehabilitation diversion pursuant to this chapter. If the court does not deem the defendant a person who would benefit by diversion at the time of the hearing, the suspended criminal proceedings may be reinstituted, or any other disposition as authorized by law may
 be made, and diversion may be ordered at a later date.

(c) If a dual agency diversion program is ordered by the court, the regional center shall submit a report to the probation department on the defendant’s progress in the diversion program not less than every six months. Within five judicial days after receiving the regional center’s report, the probation department shall submit its report on the defendant’s progress in the diversion program, with the full report of the regional center appended, to the court and to the prosecutor. If single agency diversion is ordered by the court, the regional center alone shall report the defendant’s progress to the court and to the prosecutor not less than every six months.

(d) This section is operative January 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 20) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 21.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative January 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.24.

No statement, or information procured therefrom, made by the defendant to any probation officer, the prosecutor, or any regional center designee during the course of the investigation conducted by either the regional center or the probation department pursuant to this chapter, and prior to the reporting to the probation department of the regional center’s findings of eligibility and recommendations to the court, shall be admissible in any action or proceeding brought subsequent to this investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1253, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.25.

No statement, or information procured therefrom, with respect to the specific offense with which the defendant is charged, which is made to a probation officer, a prosecutor, or a regional center designee subsequent to the granting of diversion shall be admissible in any action or proceeding brought subsequent to the investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1253, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.26.

In the event that diversion is either denied or is subsequently revoked once it has been granted, neither the probation investigation nor the statements or other information divulged by the defendant during the investigation by the probation department or the regional center shall be used in any sentencing procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1253, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.27.

At such time as the defendant’s case is diverted, any bail, bond, or undertaking, or deposit in lieu thereof, on file or on behalf of the defendant shall be exonerated, and the court shall enter an order so directing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1253, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.28.

The period during which criminal proceedings against the defendant may be diverted shall be no longer than two years. The responsible agency or agencies shall file reports on the defendant’s progress in the diversion program with the court and with the prosecutor not less than every six months.

(a) Where dual agency diversion has been ordered, the probation department shall be responsible for the progress reports. The probation department shall append to its own report a copy of the regional center’s assessment of the defendant’s progress.

(b) Where single agency diversion has been ordered, the regional center alone shall be responsible for the progress reports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1253, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.29.

(a) If it appears that the divertee is not meeting the terms and conditions of the diversion program, the court may hold a hearing and amend the program to provide for greater supervision by the responsible regional center alone, by the probation department alone, or by both the regional center and the probation department. However, notwithstanding the modification of a diversion order, the court may hold a hearing to determine whether the diverted criminal proceedings should be reinstituted if any of the following circumstances exists:

(1) The defendant is charged with an additional misdemeanor allegedly committed during the pretrial diversion and that reflects the defendant’s propensity for violence.

(2) The defendant is charged with an additional felony allegedly committed during the pretrial diversion.

(3) The defendant is engaged in criminal conduct rendering the defendant unsuitable for diversion.

(4) The defendant’s performance in the diversion program is unsatisfactory.

(b) In cases of dual agency diversion, a hearing to reinstitute the diverted criminal proceedings may be initiated by either the court, the prosecutor, the regional center, or the probation department.

(c) In cases of single agency diversion, a hearing to reinstitute the diverted criminal proceedings may be initiated only by the court, the prosecutor, or the regional center.

(d) No hearing for either of these purposes shall be held unless the moving agency or the court has given the divertee prior notice of the hearing.

(e) Where the cause of the hearing is a subsequent charge of a felony against the divertee subsequent to the diversion order, any hearing to reinstitute the diverted criminal proceedings shall be delayed until such time as probable cause has been established in court to bind the defendant over for trial on the subsequently charged felony.

(f) This section is operative January 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 22) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 23.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative January 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.30.

At any time during which the defendant is participating in a diversion program, he or she may withdraw consent to further participate in the diversion program, and at such time as such consent is withdrawn, the suspended criminal proceedings may resume or such other disposition may be made as is authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1253, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.31.

If the divertee has performed satisfactorily during the period of diversion, the criminal charges shall be dismissed at the end of the diversion period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1253, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.32.

Any record filed with the State Department of Justice shall indicate the disposition of those cases diverted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1253, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.33.

(a) Any record filed with the Department of Justice shall indicate the disposition in those cases diverted pursuant to this chapter. Upon successful completion of a diversion program, the arrest upon which the diversion was based shall be deemed to have never occurred. The divertee may indicate in response to any question concerning his or her prior criminal record that he or she was not arrested or diverted for the offense, except as specified in subdivision (b). A record pertaining to an arrest resulting in successful completion of a diversion program shall not, without the divertee’s consent, be used in any way that could result in the denial of any employment, benefit, license, or certificate.

(b) The divertee shall be advised that, regardless of his or her successful completion of diversion, the arrest upon which the diversion was based may be disclosed by the Department of Justice in response to any peace officer application request and that, notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not relieve him or her of the obligation to disclose the arrest in response to any direct question contained in any questionnaire or application for a position as a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 743, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.34.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the diversion-related individual program plan shall be fully implemented by the regional centers upon court order and approval of the diversion-related treatment and habilitation plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1253, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.8A. Diversion of Individuals with Mental Disorders [1001.35. - 1001.36.]

1001.35.

The purpose of this chapter is to promote all of the following:

(a) Increased diversion of individuals with mental disorders to mitigate the individuals’ entry and reentry into the criminal justice system while protecting public safety.

(b) Allowing local discretion and flexibility for counties in the development and implementation of diversion for individuals with mental disorders across a continuum of care settings.

(c) Providing diversion that meets the unique mental health treatment and support needs of individuals with mental disorders.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 34, Sec. 24.   (AB 1810)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.36.

(a) On an accusatory pleading alleging the commission of a misdemeanor or felony offense not set forth in subdivision (d), the court may, in its discretion, and after considering the positions of the defense and prosecution, grant pretrial diversion to a defendant pursuant to this section if the defendant satisfies the eligibility requirements for pretrial diversion set forth in subdivision (b) and the court determines that the defendant is suitable for that diversion under the factors set forth in subdivision (c).

(b) A defendant is eligible for pretrial diversion pursuant to this section if both of the following criteria are met:

(1) The defendant has been diagnosed with a mental disorder as identified in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, including, but not limited to, bipolar disorder, schizophrenia, schizoaffective disorder, or post-traumatic stress disorder, but excluding antisocial personality disorder and pedophilia. Evidence of the defendant’s mental disorder shall be provided by the defense and shall include a diagnosis or treatment for a diagnosed mental disorder within the last five years by a qualified mental health expert. In opining that a defendant suffers from a qualifying disorder, the qualified mental health expert may rely on an examination of the defendant, the defendant’s medical records, arrest reports, or any other relevant evidence.

(2) The defendant’s mental disorder was a
 significant factor in the commission of the charged offense. If the defendant has been diagnosed with a mental disorder, the court shall find that the defendant’s mental disorder was a significant factor in the commission of the offense unless there is clear and convincing evidence that it was not a motivating factor, causal factor, or contributing factor to the defendant’s involvement in the alleged offense. A court may consider any relevant and credible evidence, including, but not limited to, police reports, preliminary hearing transcripts, witness statements, statements by the defendant’s mental health treatment provider, medical records, records or reports by qualified medical experts, or evidence that the defendant displayed symptoms consistent with the relevant mental disorder at or near the time of the offense.

(c) For any defendant
 who satisfies the eligibility requirements in subdivision (b), the court must consider whether the defendant is suitable for pretrial diversion. A defendant is suitable for pretrial diversion if all of the following criteria are met:

(1) In the opinion of a qualified mental health expert, the defendant’s symptoms of the mental disorder causing, contributing to, or motivating the criminal behavior would respond to mental health treatment.

(2) The defendant consents to diversion and waives the defendant’s right to a speedy trial, or a defendant has been found to be an appropriate candidate for diversion in lieu of commitment pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of, or clause (v) of subparagraph (C), of, paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370, or subparagraph
 (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370.01 and, as a result of the defendant’s mental incompetence, cannot consent to diversion or give a knowing and intelligent waiver of the defendant’s right to a speedy trial.

(3) The defendant agrees to comply with treatment as a condition of diversion, or the defendant has been found to be an appropriate candidate for diversion in lieu of commitment for restoration of competency treatment pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of, or clause (v) of subparagraph (C) of, paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370 or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370.01 and, as a result of the defendant’s mental incompetence, cannot agree to comply with treatment.

(4) The defendant will not
 pose an unreasonable risk of danger to public safety, as defined in Section 1170.18, if treated in the community. The court may consider the opinions of the district attorney, the defense, or a qualified mental health expert, and may consider the defendant’s treatment plan, the defendant’s violence and criminal history, the current charged offense, and any other factors that the court deems appropriate.

(d) A defendant may not be placed into a diversion program, pursuant to this section, for the following current charged offenses:

(1) Murder or voluntary manslaughter.

(2) An offense for which a person, if convicted, would be required to register pursuant to Section 290, except for a violation of Section 314.

(3) Rape.

(4) Lewd or lascivious act on a child under 14 years of age.

(5) Assault with intent to commit rape, sodomy, or oral copulation, in violation of Section 220.

(6) Commission of rape or sexual penetration in concert with another person, in violation of Section 264.1.

(7) Continuous sexual abuse of a child, in violation of Section 288.5.

(8) A violation of subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 11418.

(e) At any stage of the proceedings, the court may require the defendant to
 make a prima facie showing that the defendant will meet the minimum requirements of eligibility for diversion and that the defendant and the offense are suitable for diversion. The hearing on the prima facie showing shall be informal and may proceed on offers of proof, reliable hearsay, and argument of counsel. If a prima facie showing is not made, the court may summarily deny the request for diversion or grant any other relief as may be deemed appropriate.

(f) As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Pretrial diversion” means the postponement of prosecution, either temporarily or permanently, at any point in the judicial process from the point at which the accused is charged until adjudication, to allow the defendant to undergo mental
 health treatment, subject to all of the following:

(A) (i) The court is satisfied that the recommended inpatient or outpatient program of mental health treatment will meet the specialized mental health treatment needs of the defendant.

(ii) The defendant may be referred to a program of mental health treatment utilizing existing inpatient or outpatient mental health resources. Before approving a proposed treatment program, the court shall consider the request of the defense, the request of the prosecution, the needs of the defendant, and the interests of the community. The treatment may be procured using private or public funds, and a referral may be made to a county mental health agency, existing collaborative courts, or assisted outpatient treatment only if
 that entity has agreed to accept responsibility for the treatment of the defendant, and mental health services are provided only to the extent that resources are available and the defendant is eligible for those services.

(iii) If the court refers the defendant to a county mental health agency pursuant to this section and the agency determines that it is unable to provide services to the defendant, the court shall accept a written declaration to that effect from the agency in lieu of requiring live testimony. That declaration shall serve only to establish that the program is unable to provide services to the defendant at that time and does not constitute evidence that the defendant is unqualified or unsuitable for diversion under this section.

(B) The provider of the mental
 health treatment program in which the defendant has been placed shall provide regular reports to the court, the defense, and the prosecutor on the defendant’s progress in treatment.

(C) The period during which criminal proceedings against the defendant may be diverted is limited as follows:

(i) If the defendant is charged with a felony, the period shall be no longer than two years.

(ii) If the defendant is charged with a misdemeanor, the period shall be no longer than one year.

(D) Upon request, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether restitution, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4, is owed to any victim as a result of the diverted
 offense and, if owed, order its payment during the period of diversion. However, a defendant’s inability to pay restitution due to indigence or mental disorder shall not be grounds for denial of diversion or a finding that the defendant has failed to comply with the terms of diversion.

(2) “Qualified mental health expert” includes, but is not limited to, a psychiatrist, psychologist, a person described in Section 5751.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or a person whose knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education qualifies them as an expert.

(g) If any of the following circumstances exists, the court shall, after notice to the defendant, defense counsel, and the prosecution, hold a hearing to determine whether the criminal proceedings should be reinstated, whether
 the treatment should be modified, or whether the defendant should be conserved and referred to the conservatorship investigator of the county of commitment to initiate conservatorship proceedings for the defendant pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code:

(1) The defendant is charged with an additional misdemeanor allegedly committed during the pretrial diversion and that reflects the defendant’s propensity for violence.

(2) The defendant is charged with an additional felony allegedly committed during the pretrial diversion.

(3) The defendant is engaged in criminal conduct rendering the defendant unsuitable for diversion.

(4) Based on the opinion of a qualified mental health expert whom the court may deem appropriate, either of the following circumstances exists:

(A) The defendant is performing unsatisfactorily in the assigned program.

(B) The defendant is gravely disabled, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A defendant shall only be conserved and referred to the conservatorship investigator pursuant to this finding.

(h) If the defendant has performed satisfactorily in diversion, at the end of the period of diversion, the court shall dismiss the defendant’s criminal charges that were the
 subject of the criminal proceedings at the time of the initial diversion. A court may conclude that the defendant has performed satisfactorily if the defendant has substantially complied with the requirements of diversion, has avoided significant new violations of law unrelated to the defendant’s mental health condition, and has a plan in place for long-term mental health care. If the court dismisses the charges, the clerk of the court shall file a record with the Department of Justice indicating the disposition of the case diverted pursuant to this section. Upon successful completion of diversion, if the court dismisses the charges, the arrest upon which the diversion was based shall be deemed never to have occurred, and the court shall order access to the record of the arrest restricted in accordance with Section 1001.9, except as specified in subdivisions (j) and (k). The defendant who
 successfully completes diversion may indicate in response to any question concerning the defendant’s prior criminal record that the defendant was not arrested or diverted for the offense, except as specified in subdivision (j).

(i) A record pertaining to an arrest resulting in successful completion of diversion, or any record generated as a result of the defendant’s application for or participation in diversion, shall not, without the defendant’s consent, be used in any way that could result in the denial of any employment, benefit, license, or certificate.

(j) The defendant shall be advised that, regardless of the defendant’s completion of diversion, both of the following apply:

(1) The arrest upon which the diversion was
 based may be disclosed by the Department of Justice to any peace officer application request and that, notwithstanding subdivision (i), this section does not relieve the defendant of the obligation to disclose the arrest in response to any direct question contained in any questionnaire or application for a position as a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.

(2) An order to seal records pertaining to an arrest made pursuant to this section has no effect on a criminal justice agency’s ability to access and use those sealed records and information regarding sealed arrests, as described in Section 851.92.

(k) A finding that the defendant suffers from a mental disorder, any progress reports concerning the defendant’s treatment, including, but not limited to, any finding that the
 defendant be prohibited from owning or controlling a firearm because they are a danger to themselves or others pursuant to subdivision (m), or any other records related to a mental disorder that were created as a result of participation in, or completion of, diversion pursuant to this section or for use at a hearing on the defendant’s eligibility for diversion under this section may not be used in any other proceeding without the defendant’s consent, unless that information is relevant evidence that is admissible under the standards described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution. However, when determining whether to exercise its discretion to grant diversion under this section, a court may consider previous records of participation in diversion under this section.

(l) The
 county agency administering the diversion, the defendant’s mental health treatment providers, the public guardian or conservator, and the court shall, to the extent not prohibited by federal law, have access to the defendant’s medical and psychological records, including progress reports, during the defendant’s time in diversion, as needed, for the purpose of providing care and treatment and monitoring treatment for diversion or conservatorship.

(m) (1) The prosecution may request an order from the court that the defendant be prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm until they successfully complete diversion because they are a danger to themselves or others pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The
 prosecution shall bear the burden of proving, by clear and convincing evidence, both of the following are true:

(A) The defendant poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to themselves or another by having in their custody or control, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm.

(B) The prohibition is necessary to prevent personal injury to the defendant or any other person because less restrictive alternatives either have been tried and found to be ineffective or are inadequate or inappropriate for the circumstances of the defendant.

(3) (A) If the court finds that the prosecution has not met that burden, the court shall not order that the person is prohibited from having,
 owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm.

(B) If the court finds that the prosecution has met the burden, the court shall order that the person is prohibited, and shall inform the person that they are prohibited, from owning or controlling a firearm until they successfully complete diversion because they are a danger to themselves or others.

(4) An order imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall be in effect until the defendant has successfully completed diversion or until their firearm rights are restored pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (g) of Section 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.5.   (SB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.81. Pretrial Diversion of Traffic Violators [1001.40. - 1001.40.]

1001.40.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county acting on behalf of one or more individual courts may by ordinance establish a program that provides for pretrial diversion by the court of any person issued a notice to appear for a traffic violation to attend any traffic violator school licensed pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 11200) of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1303, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.9. Diversion of Misdemeanor Offenders [1001.50. - 1001.55.]

1001.50.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this chapter shall become operative in a county only if the board of supervisors adopts the provisions of this chapter by ordinance.

(b) The district attorney of each county shall review annually any diversion program established pursuant to this chapter, and no program shall continue without the approval of the district attorney. No person shall be diverted under a program unless it has been approved by the district attorney. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize the prosecutor to determine whether a particular defendant shall be diverted.
